Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-411
Penalties.

(1) A physician or other health care provider who willfully fails to transfer the care of a patient in accordance with section 20-409 shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(2) A physician who willfully fails to record a determination of terminal condition or persistent vegetative state or the terms of a declaration in accordance with section 20-407 shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(3) An individual who willfully conceals, cancels, defaces, or obliterates the declaration of another individual without the declarant's consent or who falsifies or forges a revocation of the declaration of another individual shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(4) An individual who falsifies or forges the declaration of another individual or willfully conceals or withholds personal knowledge of a revocation under section 20-406 shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(5) A person who requires or prohibits the execution of a declaration as a condition for being insured for, or receiving, health care services shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(6) A person who coerces or fraudulently induces an individual to execute a declaration shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(7) The penalties provided in this section shall not displace any sanction applicable under other law.

Laws 1992, LB 671, § 11.